Hawaii, session 2026, HB2222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended by adding a new chapter to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Chapter Casino gaming §   -1  Limited casino gaming authorized.  Casino gaming and a system of wagering incorporated therein, as defined in this chapter, are authorized only to the extent that casino gaming and wagering is conducted in accordance with this chapter.  In case of any conflict between this chapter and any other law regarding casino gambling, this chapter shall prevail.  This chapter and the rules adopted by the commission shall apply to all persons who are licensed or otherwise participate in gaming as permitted under this chapter. §   -2  Definitions.  As used in this chapter: "Affiliate" means a person who, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries: (1)  Controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with; (2)  Is in a partnership or joint venture relationship with; or (3)  Is a co-shareholder of a corporation, a co-member of a limited liability company, or a co-partner in a limited liability partnership with, a person who holds or applies for a casino license under this chapter. "Agent" means any person who is employed by any agency of the State, other than the commission, who is assigned to perform full-time services on behalf of or for the benefit of the commission regardless of the title or position held by that person. "Applicant" means any person who applies for a license under this chapter. "Casino facility" means a freestanding, land-based structure in which casino gaming permitted under this chapter may be conducted, which may include bars, restaurants, showrooms, theaters, or other facilities. "Casino facility" does not include any structure used for hotel or other transient accommodation lodging purposes. "Casino gaming", "limited casino gaming", "game", or "gaming", as the context may require, means the operation of games conducted pursuant to this chapter in a licensed casino facility including but not limited to the games commonly known as baccarat, twenty-one, poker, craps, slot machine, video gaming of chance, roulette wheel, klondike table, punch-board, faro layout, numbers ticket, push car, jar ticket, pull tab, or their common variants, or any other game of chance that is authorized by the commission as a wagering device. "Casino license" means a license to operate and maintain a casino facility for casino gaming permitted under this chapter. "Chairperson" means the chairperson of the Hawaii gaming control commission. "Commission" means the Hawaii gaming control commission. "Conflict of interest" means a situation in which the private interest of a member, employee, or agent of the commission may influence the judgment of the member, employee, or agent in the performance of the member's, employee's, or agent's public duty under this chapter.  "Conflict of interest" includes but is not limited to the following: (1)  Any conduct that would lead a reasonable person, knowing all of the circumstances, to conclude that the member, employee, or agent of the commission is biased against or in favor of an applicant; (2)  Acceptance of any form of compensation other than from the commission for any services rendered as part of the official duties of the member, employee, or agent for the commission; or (3)  Participation in any business being transacted with or before the commission in which the member, employee, or agent of the commission or the member's, employee's, or agent's parent, spouse, or child has a financial interest. "Department" means the department of commerce and consumer affairs. "Ex parte communication" means any communication, direct or indirect, regarding a licensing application, disciplinary action, or a contested case under this chapter other than communication that takes place during a meeting or hearing conducted under this chapter or in a manner otherwise authorized by this chapter. "Executive director" means the executive director of the commission. "Financial interest" or "financially interested" means any interest in investments, awarding of contracts, grants, loans, purchases, leases, sales, or similar matters under consideration or consummated by the commission or holding a one per cent or more ownership interest in an applicant or a licensee.  For purposes of this definition, a member, employee, or agent of the commission shall be considered to have a financial interest in a matter under consideration if any of the following circumstances exist: (1)  The individual owns one per cent or more of any class of outstanding securities that are issued by a party to the matter under consideration or consummated by the commission; or (2)  The individual is employed by or is an independent contractor for a party to the matter under consideration or consummated by the commission. "Gross receipts": (1)  Means the total of: (A)  Cash received or retained as winnings by a licensee; (B)  Cash received in payment for credit extended by a licensee to a patron for purposes of gaming; and (C)  Compensation received for conducting any game in which a licensee is not party to a wager; and (2)  Does not include: (A)  Counterfeit money or tokens; (B)  Coins of other countries that are received in gaming devices; (C)  Cash taken in fraudulent acts perpetrated against a licensee for which the licensee is not reimbursed; (D)  Cash received as entry fees for contests or tournaments in which patrons compete for prizes; and (E)  The dollar amount of promotional play, including non-cashable vouchers, coupons, and electronic promotions, redeemed by wagerers in the casino, up to and including an amount not to exceed twenty per cent of a licensee's gross receipts. "Individual" means a natural person. "Institutional investor" means: (1)  Any retirement fund administered by a public agency for the exclusive benefit of federal, state, or county public employees; (2)  An employee benefit plan, or pension fund that is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended; (3)  An investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940; (4)  A collective investment trust organized by a bank under title 12 Code of Federal Regulations section 9.18; (5)  A closed-end investment trust; (6)  A chartered or licensed life insurance company or property and casualty insurance company; (7)  A chartered or licensed financial institution; (8)  An investment advisor registered under the Investment Advisers Act of 1940; and (9)  Any other person as the commission may determine for reasons consistent with this chapter. "Investigative hearing" means any hearing conducted by the commission or its authorized representative to investigate and gather information or evidence regarding pending license applicants, qualifiers, licensees, or alleged or apparent violations of this chapter or rules adopted by the commission. "Investigative hearing" includes any matter related to an apparent deficiency, except for informal conferences requested under section    ‑11. "Managerial employee" means a person who holds a policymaking position with the commission or any vendor or licensee under this chapter. "Occupational license" means a license issued by the commission to a person or entity to perform an occupation relating to casino gaming in the State that the commission has identified as an occupation that requires a license. "Person" means an individual, association, partnership, estate, trust, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity. "Qualifier" means an affiliate, affiliated company, officer, director, or managerial employee of an applicant, or a person who holds greater than a five per cent direct or indirect interest in an applicant.  As used in this definition, "affiliate" and "affiliated company" do not include a partnership, a joint venture relationship, a co-shareholder of a corporation, a co-member of a limited liability company, or a co-partner in a limited liability partnership that has a five per cent or less direct interest in the applicant and is not involved in the casino as defined in rules adopted by the commission. "Slot machine" means any mechanical, electrical, or other device, contrivance, or machine that is authorized by the commission as a wagering device under this chapter which, upon insertion of a coin, currency, token, or similar object, or upon payment of any consideration whatsoever, is available to play or operate, the play or operation of which may deliver or entitle the person playing or operating the machine to receive cash, premiums, merchandise, tokens, or anything of value whatsoever, whether the payoff is made automatically from the machine or in any other manner whatsoever.  A slot machine: (1)  May utilize spinning reels or video displays, or both; (2)  May or may not dispense coins, tickets, or tokens to winning patrons; (3)  May use an electronic credit system for receiving wagers and making payouts; and (4)  May simulate a table game. "Slot machine" does not include table games authorized by the commission as a wagering device under this Act. "Supplier" means a person that the commission has identified under rules adopted by the commission as requiring a license to provide casino licensees with goods or services regarding the realty, construction, maintenance, or business of a proposed or existing casino facility on a regular or continuing basis, including security businesses, manufacturers, distributors, persons who service gaming devices or equipment, garbage haulers, maintenance companies, food purveyors, and construction companies. "Supplier's license" means a license that authorizes a supplier to furnish any equipment, devices, supplies, or services to a licensed casino facility permitted under this chapter. "Table game" means a live gaming apparatus upon which gaming is conducted or that determines an outcome that is the object of a wager, including but not limited to baccarat, twenty-one, blackjack, poker, craps, roulette wheel, electronic or stadium seating games operated with a live dealer, klondike table, punchboard, faro layout, keno layout, numbers ticket, push card, jar ticket, pull tab, or other similar games that are authorized by the commission as a wagering device under this chapter.  "Table game" does not include slot machines or video games of chance. "Vendor" means a person who is not licensed under this chapter and supplies any goods or services to a casino licensee or supplier licensee. "Wagerer" means a person who plays a gambling game authorized under this chapter. §   -3  Hawaii gaming control commission.  (a)  There is established the Hawaii gaming control commission, which shall be a body corporate and a public instrumentality of the State for the purpose of implementing this chapter.  The commission shall be placed within the department for administrative purposes.  The commission shall consist of five members to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate under section 26-34.  Of the five members, one shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted to the governor by the president of the senate and one shall be appointed from a list of nominees submitted to the governor by the speaker of the house of representatives.  Appointments of initial commission members shall be made within ten days of the effective date of this Act. (b)  No person shall be appointed as a member of the commission or continue to be a member of the commission if the person: (1)  Is an elected state official; (2)  Is licensed by the commission pursuant to this chapter, or is an official of, has a financial interest in, or has a financial relationship with, any gaming operation subject to the jurisdiction of the commission pursuant to this chapter; (3)  Is related to any person within the second degree of consanguinity or affinity who is licensed by the commission pursuant to this chapter; or (4)  Has been under indictment, convicted, pled guilty or nolo contendere, or forfeited bail for a felony or a misdemeanor involving gambling or fraud under the laws of this State, any other state, or the United States within the ten years prior to appointment, or a local ordinance in a state involving gambling or fraud that substantially corresponds to a misdemeanor in that state within the ten years prior to appointment. (c)  The term of office of a commission member shall be five years.  Vacancies in the commission shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointments; provided that the governor shall have thirty days following the occurrence of a vacancy to appoint a successor member to the commission. (d)  After due notice and public hearing, the governor may remove or suspend for cause any member of the commission. (e)  Members of the commission shall: (1)  Be a resident of the State; (2)  Serve part-time; (3)  Be paid $300 for each day in the performance of official duties; and (4)  Be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of official duties. (f)  Officers of the commission, including the chairperson, shall be selected by the members.  The commission, subject to chapter 92, shall hold at least one meeting in each quarter of the State's fiscal year.  The commission shall hold its initial meeting within twenty days of the effective date of this Act.  Special meetings may be called by the chairperson or any three members upon seventy-two hours' written notice to each member.  Three members shall constitute a quorum, and a majority vote of the five members present shall be required for any final determination by the commission. The commission shall keep a complete and accurate record of all its meetings. (g)  Before assuming the duties of office, each member of the commission shall take an oath that the member shall faithfully execute the duties of office according to the laws of the State and shall file and maintain with the director a bond in the sum of $25,000 with good and sufficient sureties.  The cost of any bond for any member of the commission under this section shall be considered a part of the necessary expenses of the commission. (h)  The commission shall appoint a person to serve as the executive director of the commission, who shall be subject to the commission's supervision.  The commission shall appoint an interim executive director within ten days of the commission's initial meeting who shall be exempt from paragraphs (3) and (4) such that the interim executive director may be a current public employee or regulatory official from a similar body in another state who temporarily undertakes the role of interim executive director.  The executive director shall: (1)  Hold office at the will of the commission; (2)  Be exempt from chapters 76 and 89; (3)  Devote full time to the duties of the office; (4)  Not hold any other office or employment; (5)  Perform any and all duties that the commission assigns; and (6)  Receive an annual salary at an amount set by the commission and be reimbursed for expenses actually and necessarily incurred in the performance of the executive director's duties. (i)  Except as otherwise provided by law, the executive director may: (1)  Hire assistants, other officers, and employees, who shall be exempt from chapters 76 and 89 and who shall serve at the will of the executive director; and (2)  Appoint committees and consultants necessary for the efficient operation of casino gaming. (j)  No person shall be hired or appointed under subsection (i) who: (1)  Is an elected state official; (2)  Is licensed by the commission pursuant to this chapter or is an official of, has a financial interest in, or has a financial relationship with, any gaming operation subject to the jurisdiction of this commission pursuant to this chapter; (3)  Is related to any person within the second degree of consanguinity or affinity who is licensed by the commission pursuant to this chapter; or (4)  Has been under indictment, convicted, pled guilty or nolo contendere, or forfeited bail for a felony or misdemeanor concerning gambling or fraud under: (A)  The laws of this State, any other state, or the United States within the last ten years; or (B)  A local ordinance in any state involving gambling or fraud that substantially corresponds to a misdemeanor in that state within the ten years prior to employment. (k)  The salaries of employees hired pursuant to subsection (i) shall be set by the executive director. (l)  The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 establishing a code of ethics for its employees that shall include restrictions prohibiting certain employees from participating in or wagering on any casino game or casino gaming operation subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.  The code of ethics shall be separate from and in addition to any standards of conduct set forth pursuant to chapter 84. (m)  No person shall be employed by the commission if: (1)  During the three years immediately preceding appointment or employment, the person held any direct or indirect interest in, or was employed by: (A)  A casino licensee under this chapter or in another jurisdiction; or (B)  A potential casino licensee who had an application to operate a casino pending before the commission or any other jurisdiction; provided that the person seeking employment may be employed by the commission if the person's interest in a casino licensee would not, in the opinion of the commission, interfere with the objective discharge of the person's employment obligations; provided further that a person shall not be employed by the commission if the person's interest in the casino licensee constitutes a controlling interest in that casino licensee; or (2)  The person or the person's spouse, parent, child, child's spouse, or sibling is a member of the commission, or a director of, or a person financially interested in, any person licensed as a casino licensee or casino supplier, or any person who has an application for a casino or occupational license pending before the commission. (n)  Each member of the commission, the executive director, and each key employee, as determined by the commission, shall file with the governor a financial disclosure statement: (1)  Listing all assets, liabilities, and property and business interests of the member, executive director, key employee, and any of their spouses; and (2)  Affirming that the member, executive director, and key employee are in compliance with this chapter. The financial disclosure statement shall be made under oath and filed at the time of employment and annually thereafter. (o)  Each employee of the commission, except the executive director or a key employee, shall file with the commission at the time of employment a financial disclosure statement listing all assets, liabilities, property and business interests, and sources of income of the employee and the employee's spouse. (p)  A member of the commission, executive director, or key employee shall not hold direct or indirect interest in, be employed by, or enter into a contract for service with, any applicant or person licensed by the commission for a period of five years after the date of termination of the person's membership on or employment with the commission. (q)  An employee of the commission shall not acquire any direct or indirect interest in, be employed by, or enter into a contract for services with any applicant or person licensed by the commission for a period of three years after the date of termination of the person's employment with the commission. (r)  A commission member or a person employed by the commission shall not represent a person or party other than the State before or against the commission for a period of three years after the date of termination of the member's term of office or the employee's period of employment with the commission. (s)  A business entity in which a former commission member or employee or agent has an interest, or any partner, officer, or employee of the business entity, shall not make any appearance or representation before the commission that is prohibited to that former member, employee, or agent. As used in this subsection, "business entity" means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited liability partnership, association, trust, or other form of legal entity. §   -4  Staff.  (a)  The executive director shall keep records of all proceedings of the commission and shall preserve all records, books, documents, and other papers belonging to the commission or entrusted to its care relating to casino gaming. (b)  In addition to persons hired under section ‑3(i), the commission may employ any personnel that may be necessary to carry out its duties related to casino gaming. §   -5  Powers of the commission.  (a)  The commission shall have all powers necessary to fully and effectively supervise all casino gaming operations, including the power to: (1)  Administer, regulate, and enforce the system of casino gaming established by this chapter; provided that the commission's jurisdiction shall extend to every person, association, corporation, partnership, trust, and any other entity with a financial interest in or holding a license under this chapter, or required under this chapter to hold a license in casino gaming operations in the city and county of Honolulu; (2)  Issue a twenty-year casino license to operate a casino facility pursuant to this chapter; (3)  Determine the types and numbers of occupational and supplier's licenses to be permitted under this chapter; (4)  Adopt standards for the licensing of all persons under this chapter subject to the qualifications and standards set forth in this chapter, issue licenses, and establish and collect fees for these licenses; (5)  Provide for the collection of all taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter and collect, receive, expend, and account for all revenues derived from casino gaming within the city and county of Honolulu; (6)  Enter at any time, without a warrant and without notice to a licensee, the premises, offices, casino facility, or other places of business of a casino licensee, or casino supplier licensee, where evidence of the compliance or noncompliance with this chapter or rules is likely to be found.  Entry is authorized to: (A)  Inspect and examine all premises wherein casino gaming or the business of gaming or the business of a supplier is conducted, or where any records of the activities are prepared; (B)  Inspect, examine, audit, impound, seize, or assume physical control of, or summarily remove from the premises all books, ledgers, documents, writings, photocopies of correspondence records, videotapes, including electronically or digitally stored records, money receptacles, other containers and their contents, equipment in which the records are stored, or other gaming-related equipment and supplies on or around the premises, including counting rooms; (C)  Inspect the person, and inspect, examine, and seize personal effects present in a casino facility licensed under this chapter of any holder of a licensed casino facility; and (D)  Investigate and deter alleged violations of this chapter or rules; (7)  Investigate alleged violations of this chapter and take appropriate disciplinary action against a casino licensee or a holder of an occupational or supplier's license for a violation or institute appropriate legal action for enforcement, or both; (8)  Be present, through its inspectors and agents, any time casino gaming operations are conducted in a casino for the purpose of certifying the casino's revenue, receiving complaints from the public, and conducting other investigations into the conduct of the casino gaming and the maintenance of the equipment as from time to time the commission may deem necessary and proper; (9)  Adopt appropriate standards for a casino facility as well as for electronic or mechanical gaming devices; (10)  Require that records, including financial or other statements, of a casino licensee be kept in the manner prescribed by the commission and that a licensee involved in the ownership or management of casino gaming operations submit to the commission: (A)  An annual balance sheet and profit and loss statement; (B)  A list of the stockholders or other persons having a five per cent or greater beneficial interest in the gaming activities of the licensee; and (C)  Any other information the commission deems necessary to effectively administer this chapter; (11)  Conduct hearings; issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and subpoenas duces tecum for the production of books, records, and other pertinent documents; and administer oaths and affirmations to the witnesses when, in the judgment of the commission, it is necessary to administer or enforce this chapter; provided that the executive director or the executive director's designee shall also be authorized to issue subpoenas and administer oaths and affirmations to witnesses; (12)  Eject or exclude, or authorize the ejection or exclusion of, any person from casino facilities where the person is in violation of this chapter or where the person's conduct or reputation is such that the person's presence within a casino facility, in the opinion of the commission, may call into question the honesty and integrity of the casino gaming operation or interfere with the orderly conduct thereof or any other action that, in the opinion of the commission, is a detriment or impediment to the casino gaming operations; provided that the propriety of the ejection or exclusion shall be subject to subsequent hearing by the commission; (13)  Permit a casino licensee of casino gaming operations to use a wagering system whereby wagerers' money may be converted to tokens, electronic cards, or chips, which shall be used only for wagering within the casino facility; (14)  Suspend, revoke, or restrict licenses, to require the removal of a licensee or an employee of a licensee for a violation of this chapter or a commission rule, or for engaging in a fraudulent practice; (15)  Impose and collect fines of up to $5,000 against individuals and up to $10,000 against a licensee for each violation of this chapter, any rules adopted by the commission, or for any other action that, in the commission's discretion, is a detriment or impediment to casino gaming operations; (16)  Establish minimum levels of insurance to be maintained by a licensee; (17)  Delegate the execution of any of its powers for the purpose of administering and enforcing this chapter; and (18)  Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this chapter; provided that the regulations of the Nevada gaming commission and the Nevada gaming control board, that are in effect on the effective date of this Act shall be the emergency interim rules of the commission.  As adopted under this chapter, all references in the Nevada regulations to "Nevada" shall mean "Hawaii" and all references to any Nevada state department, agency, commission, statute, or rule shall mean the equivalent or similar department, agency, commission, statute, or rule of the State.  To the extent the Nevada regulations are inconsistent with this chapter, this chapter shall supersede the Nevada regulations.  Due to the imminent peril to public health, safety, or morals absent valid rules related to gaming authorized by this chapter, the commission, under chapter 91, may amend the emergency interim rules to correct inconsistencies between the Nevada regulations and this chapter, but the commission shall retain as much of the emergency interim rules as possible until at least the date on which the casino licensee authorized by this chapter begins operating the gaming facility authorized under this chapter. (b)  Rules adopted under this chapter shall not be arbitrary, capricious, or contradictory to the provisions of chapter 91.  Rules may include but need not be limited to rules that: (1)  Govern, restrict, approve, or regulate the casino gaming authorized in this chapter; (2)  Promote the safety, security, and integrity of casino gaming authorized in this chapter; (3)  License and regulate, consistent with the qualifications and standards set forth in this chapter, persons participating in or involved with casino gaming authorized in this chapter; and (4)  Authorize any other action that may be reasonable or appropriate to enforce this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. (c)  This section is not intended to limit warrantless inspections except in accordance with constitutional requirements. §   -6  Member, employee, or agent of commission; conduct generally.  (a) By January 31 of each year, each member of the commission shall prepare and file with the commission a disclosure form in which the member shall: (1)  Affirm that the member or the member's spouse, parent, child, or child's spouse is not a member of the board of directors of, financially interested in, or employed by, a licensee or applicant; (2)  Affirm that the member continues to meet all other criteria for commission membership under this chapter or the rules adopted by the commission; (3)  Disclose any legal or beneficial interest in any real property that is or may be directly or indirectly involved with gaming operations authorized by this chapter; and (4)  Disclose any other information that may be required to ensure that the integrity of the commission and its work is maintained. (b)  By January 31 of each year, each employee of the commission shall prepare and file with the commission a disclosure form in which the employee shall: (1)  Affirm the absence of financial interests prohibited by this chapter; (2)  Disclose any legal or beneficial interests in any real property that is or that may be directly or indirectly involved with gaming or gaming operations authorized by this chapter; (3)  Disclose whether the employee or the employee's spouse, parent, child, or child's spouse is financially interested in or employed by a supplier licensee, or an applicant for a supplier's license, under this chapter; and (4)  Disclose any other information that may be required to ensure that the integrity of the commission and its work is maintained. (c)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission who becomes aware that the member, employee, or agent of the commission or their spouse, parent, or child is a member of the board of directors of, financially interested in, or employed by a licensee or an applicant shall immediately provide detailed written notice to the chairperson. (d)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission who has been indicted, charged with, convicted of, pled guilty or nolo contendere to, or forfeited bail for: (1)  A misdemeanor involving gambling, dishonesty, theft, or fraud; (2)  A local ordinance in any state involving gambling, dishonesty, theft, or fraud that substantially corresponds to a misdemeanor in that state; or (3)  A felony under Hawaii law, the laws of any other state, or the laws of the United States, or any other jurisdiction, shall immediately provide detailed written notice of the conviction or charge to the chairperson. (e)  Any member, employee, or agent of the commission who is negotiating for, or acquires by any means, any interest in any person who is a licensee or an applicant or is affiliated with a person who is a licensee or an applicant, shall immediately provide written notice of the details of the interest to the chairperson. The member, employee, or agent of the commission shall not act on behalf of the commission with respect to that person. (f)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission shall not enter into any negotiations for employment with any person or affiliate of any person who is a licensee or an affiliate and shall immediately provide written notice of the details of any negotiations or discussions to the chairperson.  The member, employee, or agent of the commission shall not take any action on behalf of the commission with respect to that person. (g)  Any member, employee, or agent of the commission who receives an invitation, written or oral, to initiate a discussion concerning employment or the possibility of employment with a person, or affiliate of a person, who is a licensee or an applicant shall immediately report the invitation to the chairperson.  The member, employee, or agent of the commission shall not take action on behalf of the commission with respect to that person. (h)  A licensee or an applicant shall not knowingly initiate a negotiation for, or discussion of, employment with a member, employee, or agent of the commission. A licensee or an applicant who initiates a negotiation or discussion about employment shall immediately provide written notice of the details of the negotiation or discussion to the chairperson as soon as that person becomes aware that the negotiation or discussion has been initiated with a member, employee, or agent of the commission. (i)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission, or former member, employee, or agent of the commission, shall not disseminate or otherwise disclose any material or information in the possession of the commission that the commission considers confidential, unless specifically authorized to do so by the chairperson or the commission. (j)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission or a parent, spouse, sibling, or child of a member, employee, or agent of the commission shall not accept any gift, gratuity, compensation, travel, lodging, or anything of value, directly or indirectly, from any licensee, applicant, or any affiliate or representative of a licensee or an applicant, unless the acceptance conforms to a written policy or directive issued by the chairperson or the commission. Any member, employee, or agent of the commission who is offered or receives any gift, gratuity, compensation, travel, lodging, or anything of value, directly or indirectly, from any licensee or any applicant or affiliate or representative of a licensee or an applicant shall immediately provide written notification of the details to the chairperson. (k)  A licensee or an applicant, or affiliate or representative of a licensee or an applicant, shall not, directly or indirectly, knowingly give or offer to give any gift, gratuity, compensation, travel, lodging, or anything of value to any member, employee, or agent of the commission that the member, employee, or agent of the commission is prohibited from accepting under subsection (j). (l)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission shall not engage in any conduct that constitutes a conflict of interest, and shall immediately advise the chairperson in writing of the details of any incident or circumstances that would present the existence of a conflict of interest with respect to the performance of commission-related work or duty of the member, employee, or agent of the commission. (m)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission who is approached and offered a bribe in violation of this chapter shall immediately provide a written account of the details of the incident to the chairperson and to a law enforcement officer of a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction. (n)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission shall disclose past involvement with any casino interest in the past five years and shall not engage in political activity or politically related activity during the duration of the person's appointment or employment. (o)  A former member, employee, or agent of the commission may appear before the commission as a witness testifying as to factual matters or actions handled by the member, employee, or agent during the person's tenure as a member, employee, or agent of the commission.  The member, employee, or agent of the commission shall not receive compensation for appearance other than a standard witness fee and reimbursement for travel expenses as established by statute or court rule. (p)  A licensee or an applicant or any affiliate or representative of a licensee or an applicant shall not engage in ex parte communications concerning a pending application, license, or enforcement action with members of the commission.  A member of the commission shall not engage in any ex parte communications with a licensee or an applicant, or with any affiliate or representative of a licensee or an applicant, concerning a pending application, license, or enforcement action. (q)  Any commission member, licensee, or applicant or affiliate or representative of a commission member, licensee, or applicant who receives any ex parte communication in violation of subsection (p), or who is aware of an attempted communication in violation of subsection (p), shall immediately report details of the communication or attempted communication in writing to the chairperson. (r)  Any member of the commission who receives an ex parte communication that attempts to influence that member's official action shall disclose the source and content of the communication to the chairperson.  The chairperson may investigate or initiate an investigation of the matter with the assistance of the attorney general and law enforcement to determine if the communication violates subsection (p) or (q) or other state law.  The disclosure under this section and the investigation shall remain confidential.  Following an investigation, the chairperson shall advise the governor or the commission, or both, of the results of the investigation and may recommend action, as the chairperson considers appropriate. (s)  A new or current employee or agent of the commission shall obtain written permission from the executive director before continuing outside employment held at the time the employee begins to work for the commission.  Permission shall be denied, or permission previously granted shall be revoked, if the nature of the work is considered to, or does create, a possible conflict of interest or otherwise interferes with the duties of the employee or agent for the commission. (t)  An employee or agent of the commission granted permission for outside employment shall not conduct any business or perform any activities, including solicitation, related to outside employment on premises used by the commission or during the employee's working hours for the commission. (u)  Whenever the chairperson is required to file disclosure forms or report in writing the details of any incident or circumstance pursuant to this section, the chairperson shall file the forms or reports to the commission. (v)  The chairperson shall report any action the chairperson has taken or contemplates taking under this section, with respect to an employee or agent or former employee or former agent, to the commission at the next meeting of the commission.  The commission may direct the executive director to take additional or different action. (w)  No member, employee, or agent of the commission may participate in or wager on any gambling game conducted by a licensee or an applicant or any affiliate of a licensee or an applicant in the State or in any other jurisdiction, except as follows: (1)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission may participate in and wager on a gambling game conducted by a licensee under this chapter, to the extent authorized by the chairperson or commission as part of the person's surveillance, security, or other official duties for the commission; and (2)  A member, employee, or agent of the commission shall advise the chairperson at least twenty-four hours in advance if the person plans to be present in a casino in this State, or in another jurisdiction, operated by a licensee, applicant, or affiliate of a licensee or an applicant, outside the scope of their official duties for the commission. (x)  Violation of this section by a licensee, applicant, or affiliate or representative of a licensee or an applicant may result in denial of the application of licensure or revocation or suspension of license or other disciplinary action by the commission. (y)  Violation of this section by a member of the commission may result in disqualification or constitute cause for removal under section    -3(d) or other disciplinary action as determined by the commission. (z)  A violation of this section by an employee or agent of the commission shall not result in termination of employment or require other disciplinary action if the commission determines that the conduct involved does not violate the purpose of this chapter.  Employment shall be terminated: (1)  If the employee or agent is a spouse, parent, child, or spouse of a child of a commission member; or (2)  If, after being offered employment or having begun employment with the commission, the employee or agent intentionally acquires a financial interest in a licensee or an applicant, or affiliate or representative of a licensee or an applicant. (aa)  If a financial interest in a licensee or an applicant, or affiliate or representative of a licensee or an applicant, is acquired by: (1)  An employee or agent that has been offered employment with the commission; (2)  An employee of the commission; or (3)  The employee's or agent's spouse, parent, or child, through no intentional action of the employee or agent, the employee or agent shall have up to thirty days to divest or terminate the financial interest.  Employment may be terminated if the interest has not been divested after thirty days. (bb)  Violation of this section does not create a civil cause of action. (cc)  As used in this section: "Outside employment" includes the following: (1)  Operation of a proprietorship; (2)  Participation in a partnership or group business enterprise; or (3)  Performance as a director or corporate officer of any for-profit corporation or banking or credit institution. "Political activity" or "politically related activity" includes: (1)  Using the person's official authority or influence for the purpose of interfering with or affecting the result of an election; (2)  Knowingly soliciting, accepting, or receiving political contributions from any person; (3)  Running for nomination or as a candidate for election to a partisan political office; or (4)  Knowingly soliciting or discouraging the participation in any political activity of any person who is: (A)  Applying for any compensation, grant, contract, ruling, license, permit, or certificate pending before the commission; or (B)  The subject of or a participant in an ongoing audit, investigation, or enforcement action being carried out by the commission. §   -7  Authorization of limited gaming; application and selection process.  (a) Casino gaming shall be permitted only a single location in the city and county of Honolulu.  Any application for a casino license shall include a casino facility development plan. (b)  The commission's applications and forms for a casino license shall be in the same form and substance as the applications and forms required for an applicant for a non-restricted Nevada gaming license that have been adopted by the Nevada gaming commission and Nevada gaming control board and are in effect on the effective date of this Act. (c)  As part of an applicant's application for a casino license, an applicant shall submit all additional information required by section    -8. (d)  Applications for a casino license shall be submitted to the commission no later than ninety days after the date of the commission's initial meeting.  The commission shall select one applicant who, in the commission's judgment, best meets all of the criteria pursuant to section    -9 no later than ninety days after the final date applications are submitted to the commission.  If the applicant selected by the commission meets all the requirements of this chapter, the commission shall issue a casino license to that applicant within thirty days after the date the applicant is selected. §   -8  Application for casino license.  (a)  A person may apply to the commission for a casino license to conduct a casino gaming operation in the city and county of Honolulu.  The application shall be made under oath on forms used in Nevada until the commission adopts forms pursuant to section    ‑7 and such forms shall include all of the following: (1)  The name, business address, telephone number, social security number, and, where applicable, the federal tax identification number of the applicant and every qualifier; (2)  The identity of any business, including, if applicable, the state of incorporation or registration, in which the applicant or qualifier has an equity interest of more than five per cent; provided that if the applicant or qualifier is a corporation, partnership, or other business entity, the applicant or qualifier shall identify any other corporation, partnership, or other business entity in which it has an equity interest of more than five per cent, including, if applicable, the state of incorporation or registration; (3)  An explanation of whether the applicant or qualifier has developed and opened a new land-based casino in an urban area within a jurisdiction in the United States that previously did not allow gaming, including a description of the casino, the casino's gross revenue, and the amount of revenue the casino has generated for state and local governments within that jurisdiction; (4)  A statement of whether the applicant or qualifier has been indicted, convicted, pled guilty or nolo contendere, or forfeited bail for any felony or for a misdemeanor involving gambling, theft, or fraud; provided that the statement shall include the date, the name and location of the court, arresting agency, prosecuting agency, the case caption, the docket number, the offense, the disposition, and the location and length of incarceration; (5)  A statement of whether the applicant or qualifier has ever been granted any license or certificate issued by a licensing authority in the State or any other jurisdiction that has been restricted, revoked, or not renewed; provided that the statement shall describe the facts and circumstances concerning that restriction, revocation, or nonrenewal, including the licensing authority, the date each action was taken, and the reason for each action; (6)  A statement of whether the applicant or qualifier, within the last ten years, has filed or had filed against it a civil or administrative action or proceeding in bankruptcy; (7)  A statement of whether the applicant or qualifier, within the last five tax years, has been adjudicated by a court or tribunal to have failed to pay any final amount of any income, sales, or gross receipts tax due and payable under federal, state, or local law, after exhaustion of all inter-agency appeals processes; provided that this statement shall identify the amount of the tax, type of tax, time periods involved, and resolution; (8)  A statement listing the names and titles of all public officials or officers of any unit of state or county government and the spouses, parents, and children of those public officials or officers who, directly or indirectly, own any financial interest in, have any beneficial interest in, are the creditors of or hold any debt instrument issued by, or hold or have an interest in any contractual or service relationship with, the applicant or qualifier.  As used in this paragraph, "public official" or "officer" does not include a person who would be listed solely because of the person's state or federal military service; (9)  The name and business telephone number of any attorney, counsel, or any other person representing an applicant or qualifier in matters before the commission; (10)  A description of the applicant's or its qualifiers' plan for community involvement or investment in the area where the casino facility will be located; and (11)  For the applicant only, a description of any proposed or approved casino gaming facility, including the economic benefit to the community, anticipated or actual number of employees, any statement from an applicant regarding compliance with federal and state affirmative action guidelines, projected or actual admissions, projected or actual gross receipts, and scientific market research, if any. (b)  Information provided on the application shall be used as the basis for a thorough background investigation that the commission shall conduct with respect to each applicant and qualifier; provided that any financial information submitted by each applicant and qualifier shall be kept confidential by the commission.  An incomplete application shall be cause for denial of a license by the commission. (c)  Applicants shall submit with their application a plan for training residents of the State for jobs that are available at the casino facility.  The plan shall take into consideration the need to provide training to low-income persons to enable those persons to qualify for jobs that will be created in the casino facility. (d)  Each applicant and qualifier shall disclose the identity of every person, association, trust, or corporation having a greater than five per cent direct or indirect financial interest in the casino gaming operation for which the license is sought.  If the disclosed entity is a: (1)  Trust, the application shall disclose the names and addresses of the beneficiaries; (2)  Corporation, the application shall disclose the names and addresses of all stockholders and directors; and (3)  Partnership, the application shall disclose the names and addresses of all partners, both general and limited. (e)  A nonrefundable application fee of $1,000,000 shall be paid to the commission by an applicant at the time of filing to defray the costs associated with an applicant and qualifier's background investigation conducted by the commission.  If the costs of the investigation exceed $1,000,000, the applicant shall pay the additional amount to the commission. §   -9  Criteria for award of a casino license.  (a)  The commission shall issue one casino license to operate a casino facility located in the city and county of Honolulu; provided that the applicant has paid the application fee required under section ‑8 and is eligible and suitable to receive a casino license under this chapter and the rules adopted by the commission, and best satisfy all of the following criteria: (1)  The applicant has submitted a casino facility development plan for the casino facility that provides the likelihood that the applicant's casino facility will increase tourism, generate jobs, provide revenue and economic benefit to the local economy, and provide revenue to the general fund; (2)  The applicant or its qualifiers shall have a bona fide plan for community involvement or investment in the area where the casino facility will be located; (3)  The applicant or its qualifiers has the financial ability to purchase and maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance and to provide an adequate surety bond; (4)  The applicant or its qualifiers has provided data identifying the applicant's sources of capital and demonstrating that the applicant has adequate capital to develop, construct, maintain, and operate the proposed casino facility; (5)  The applicant or its qualifiers has adequate capitalization to develop, construct, maintain, and operate, for the duration of the license, the proposed casino facility in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted by the commission and to responsibly pay off its secured and unsecured debts in accordance with its financing agreement and other contractual obligations; (6)  As of July 1, 2026, the applicant or any of its qualifiers demonstrate that they have successfully developed and opened, as opposed to acquired, and currently operate at least four permanent casinos in any jurisdiction in the United States.  As used in this paragraph, "permanent casino" means a lawfully operating gaming facility with a minimum of one thousand slot machines and, if table games were authorized by law, forty table games; (7)  Neither the applicant nor any of its qualifiers have been indicted, convicted, pled guilty or nolo contendere, or forfeited bail for any felony or for a misdemeanor involving gambling, theft, or fraud; (8)  Neither the applicant nor any of its qualifiers, within the last ten years, have filed, or had filed against them, a proceeding for bankruptcy; (9)  The extent to which an applicant or any of its qualifiers have, within the last five tax years, been adjudicated by a court or tribunal to have failed to pay any final amount of income, sales, or gross receipts tax due and payable under federal, state, or local law, after settlements or exhaustion of all inter-agency appeals processes; (10)  The extent to which the applicant meets other standards for the issuance of a casino license that the commission may have adopted by rule; (11)  To ensure the continued integrity of Hawaii collegiate athletics, neither the applicant, nor any parent or subsidiary of the applicant, shall permit wagering within the State on Hawaii collegiate athletics; (12)  The adequacy of the applicant's plan for training residents of the State for jobs that are available at the casino facility and the extent to which the plan considers the need to provide training to low-income persons to enable those persons to qualify for jobs that will be created in the casino facility; and (13)  The caliber of the proposed casino gaming facility, including the proposed casino facility's aesthetic appearance, location, amount of economic benefit to the community, lack of a business conflict of interest of the qualifier, anticipated or actual number of employees, compliance with federal and state affirmative action guidelines, and projected or actual gross receipts. (b)  Any rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91 shall not be arbitrary, capricious, or contradictory to the expressed provisions of this chapter and shall further define and clarify the criteria listed in subsection (a) rather than create new conditions for licensure. (c)  An applicant shall be ineligible to receive a casino license if the applicant or any employee or qualifier of the applicant: (1)  Has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this State, any other state, or the United States; (2)  Has been convicted of any violation under part III of chapter 712, or substantially similar laws of another jurisdiction; (3)  Knowingly submitted an application for a license under this chapter that contains false information; (4)  Is a member or employee of the commission; or (5)  Has had a license to own or operate gaming facilities in this State or any other jurisdiction revoked. (d)  To demonstrate financial ability, the applicant may include the economic resources available directly or indirectly to the casino license applicant and its qualifiers. (e)  Simultaneous with an applicant's submission of an application, each applicant and qualifier that is a natural person shall submit to the commission on fingerprint cards issued by the Federal Bureau of Investigation or in digital format two sets of fingerprints for each applicant and qualifier. (f)  The commission may revoke the casino license if the licensee fails to begin regular casino gaming operations within twelve months of receipt of the commission's approval of the application or twelve months after a certificate of occupancy for the casino facility is first issued, whichever is later, upon a finding by the commission that the casino license revocation is in the best interest of the State. (g)  The commission shall establish a process to facilitate and expedite the approval of the necessary licenses and permits.  The commission may establish its own procedures for the issuance of liquor licenses for any holder of a casino license under this chapter and the holder of a casino license shall not be subject to any requirement of the Honolulu liquor commission as to the approval of forms of live or professional music, dancing, and entertainment; provided that all other state laws and county ordinances relating to liquor are met.  The commission shall be the receiving agency for any environmental assessment required under chapter 343. (h)  Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to prohibit a casino licensee from operating a school to train occupational licensees. §   -10  Bond of licensee.  Before a casino license is issued, the licensee shall file a bond in the sum of $200,000 with the department.  The bond shall be used to guarantee that the licensee faithfully makes the payments, keeps books and records, makes reports, and conducts games of chance in conformity with this chapter and rules adopted by the commission. The bond shall not be canceled by a surety on less than thirty days' notice in writing to the commission.  If a bond is canceled and the licensee fails to file a new bond with the commission in the required amount on or before the effective date of cancellation, the licensee's license shall be revoked.  The total and aggregate liability of the surety on the bond shall be limited to the amount specified in the bond. §   -11  Application deficiency.  (a)  If, in the review of an application submitted under this chapter, the executive director identifies an apparent deficiency that, if true, would require denial of the license or the disqualification of a qualifier, the executive director shall immediately notify the affected applicant or qualifier in writing of the apparent deficiency.  The applicant or qualifier may then request a confidential informal conference with the executive director to discuss the factual basis of the apparent deficiency. (b)  The executive director shall provide the applicant or qualifier a reasonable period of time to correct the apparent deficiency and, if the apparent deficiency is not corrected within the reasonable time period, the executive director shall find that the apparent deficiency has not been corrected.  Following this finding, the affected applicant or qualifier shall have an opportunity to appeal the executive director's finding to the commission.  The commission shall conduct an investigative hearing, pursuant to section    ‑17 and in accordance with rules adopted under this chapter, to determine whether there is sufficient evidence to support an apparent deficiency finding.  At the hearing, the burden of proof shall be on the executive director to demonstrate that the finding of an apparent deficiency is supported by law and facts. Any finding by the commission regarding an applicant's or a qualifier's apparent deficiency shall not constitute a final determination by the commission as to the suitability of the applicant to hold a license or the suitability of a qualifier to hold an ownership interest in a casino applicant. (c)  At any time prior to a finding by the commission that a qualifier is unsuitable to hold an ownership interest in a casino applicant, a qualifier shall have the ability to sell its ownership interest in the casino applicant to the casino applicant, another qualifier, or a third party. (d)  A qualifier who has been issued a finding of an apparent deficiency shall have the right to request that the commission expand the apparent deficiency hearing under this section to include a determination of the qualifier's suitability to hold an ownership interest in the casino license applicant.  If such a request is made, the commission shall determine the suitability of the affected qualifier separate from the suitability of the casino applicant and any of its other qualifiers.  A request by a qualifier for an extended hearing pursuant to this section shall not prevent the commission from issuing a license to the applicant.  Until the commission determines that a qualifier under this section is suitable to hold an ownership interest in the casino applicant, the casino applicant or licensee shall not: (1)  Make any direct or indirect payments or distributions of revenue or other benefits to the qualifier that are related in any way to the qualifier's interest in the applicant; and (2)  Pay any direct or indirect compensation to the qualifier for services rendered to the applicant, unless specifically approved and authorized by the commission. §   -12  Institutional investor.  (a)  Unless the commission determines that an institutional investor is unqualified, an institutional investor holding less than ten per cent of the equity securities of a casino licensee's affiliate or affiliated company that is related in any way to the financing of the casino licensee shall be granted a waiver of the eligibility and suitability requirements if: (1)  The securities are those of a publicly traded corporation and its holdings of those securities were purchased for investment purposes only; and (2)  Upon request by the commission, the institutional investor files with the commission a certified statement that it has no intention of influencing or affecting the affairs of the issuer, the casino licensee, or its affiliate or affiliated company. (b)  The commission may grant a waiver under this section to an institutional investor holding a higher percentage of securities than allowed in subsection (a) upon a showing of good cause and if the conditions specified in subsection (a) are met. (c)  An institutional investor granted a waiver under this section that subsequently intends to influence or affect the affairs of the issuer shall provide notice to the commission and file an application for a determination of eligibility and suitability before taking any action that may influence or affect the affairs of the issuer. (d)  Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter, an institutional investor may vote on all matters that are put to the vote of the outstanding security holders of the issuer. (e)  If an institutional investor changes its investment intent or if the commission finds that the institutional investor is unqualified, no action other than divestiture of the security holdings shall be taken until there has been compliance with this chapter. (f)  The casino licensee or an affiliate or affiliated company of the casino licensee shall immediately notify the commission of any information concerning an institutional investor holding its equity securities that may affect the eligibility and suitability of the institutional investor for a waiver under this section. (g)  If the commission finds that an institutional investor, holding any security of an affiliate or affiliated company of a casino licensee that is related in any way to the financing of the casino licensee, fails to comply with the requirements of this section, or if at any time the commission finds that, by reason of the extent or nature of its holdings, an institutional investor is in a position to exercise a substantial impact upon the controlling interests of a casino licensee, the commission may take any necessary action to protect the public interest, including requiring the institutional investor to satisfy the eligibility and suitability requirements under sections    ‑8,    ‑9, and    ‑10. §   -13  Supplier's licenses.  (a)  No person shall furnish in excess of $500,000 worth of equipment, devices, or supplies to a licensed casino gaming operation under this chapter unless the person has first obtained a supplier's license pursuant to this section.  The commission may issue a supplier's license to any person, firm, or corporation that pays a nonrefundable application fee as set by the commission upon a determination by the commission that the applicant is eligible for a supplier's license and upon payment by the applicant of a $5,000 license fee.  Supplier's licenses shall be renewable annually upon payment of the $5,000 annual license fee and a determination by the commission that the supplier licensee continues to meet all of the requirements of this chapter. (b)  The holder of a supplier's license may sell or lease, or contract to sell or lease, gaming equipment and supplies to any licensee involved in the ownership or management of casino gaming operations. (c)  Casino gaming supplies and equipment shall not be distributed unless supplies and equipment conform to standards adopted by rules of the commission. (d)  A person, firm, or corporation shall be ineligible to receive a supplier's license if: (1)  The person has been convicted of a felony under the laws of this State, any other state, or the United States; (2)  The person has been convicted of any violation under part III of chapter 712, or substantially similar laws of another jurisdiction; (3)  The person has knowingly submitted an application for a license under this chapter that contains false information; (4)  The person is a member of the commission; (5)  The firm or corporation is one in which a person identified in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) is an officer, director, or managerial employee; (6)  The firm or corporation employs a person, identified in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4), that participates in the management or operation of casino gaming authorized under this chapter; or (7)  The license of the person, firm, or corporation issued under this chapter, or a license to own or operate casino gaming facilities in any other jurisdiction, has been revoked. (e)  A supplier shall: (1)  Furnish to the commission a list of all equipment, devices, and supplies offered for sale or lease in connection with casino games authorized under this chapter; (2)  Keep books and records for the furnishing of equipment, devices, and supplies to casino gaming operations separate and distinct from any other business that the supplier might operate; (3)  File quarterly returns with the commission listing all sales and leases; (4)  Permanently affix its name to all its equipment, devices, and supplies used for casino gaming operations; and (5)  File an annual report listing its inventories of casino gaming equipment, devices, and supplies. (f)  Any person who knowingly makes a false statement on an application is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. (g)  Any casino gaming equipment, devices, or supplies provided by any licensed supplier may either be repaired in the casino facility or be removed from the casino facility to a facility owned by the holder of a casino license for repair.  Any supplier's equipment, devices, and supplies that are used by any person in an unauthorized gaming operation shall be forfeited to the county. §   -14  Occupational licenses.  (a)  The commission may issue an occupational license to an applicant upon: (1)  The payment of a nonrefundable application fee set by the commission; (2)  A determination by the commission that the applicant is eligible for an occupational license; and (3)  Payment of an annual license fee in an amount set by the commission. (b)  To be eligible for an occupational license, an applicant shall: (1)  Be: (A)  At least twenty-one years of age if the applicant performs any function involved in casino gaming by patrons; or (B)  At least eighteen years of age if the applicant is seeking an occupational license for a non-gaming function; (2)  Not have been convicted of a felony offense in any jurisdiction or a crime involving dishonesty or moral turpitude; and (3)  Have met standards for the holding of an occupational license as provided in rules adopted by the commission, including background inquiries and other requirements. (c)  Each application for an occupational license shall be on forms prescribed by the commission and shall contain all information required by the commission.  The applicant shall set forth in the application whether the applicant has: (1)  Been issued prior gaming-related licenses in any jurisdiction; (2)  Been licensed in any other jurisdiction under any other name, and if so, the name and the applicant's age at the time; and (3)  Had a permit or license issued from any other jurisdiction suspended, restricted, or revoked, and if so, for what period of time. (d)  Each applicant shall submit two sets of the applicant's fingerprints with the application. The commission shall charge each applicant a fee to defray the costs associated with the search and classification of fingerprints obtained by the commission with respect to the application. (e)  The commission may refuse to grant an occupational license to any person: (1)  Who is unqualified to perform the duties required of the applicant; (2)  Who fails to disclose or states falsely any information called for in the application; (3)  Who has been found guilty of a violation of this chapter or whose prior casino gaming-related license or application has been suspended, restricted, revoked, or denied for just cause in any other jurisdiction; or (4)  For any other just cause. (f)  The commission may suspend, revoke, or restrict any occupational licensee: (1)  For any violation of this chapter; (2)  For any violation of the rules of the commission; (3)  For any cause which, if known to the commission, would have disqualified the applicant from receiving a license; (4)  For default in the payment of any obligation or debt due to the State or the county; or (5)  For any other just cause. (g)  A person who knowingly makes a false statement on an application is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. (h)  Any license issued pursuant to this section shall be valid for a period of one year from the date of issuance and shall be renewable annually upon payment of the annual license fee and a determination by the commission that the licensee continues to meet all of the requirements of this chapter. (i)  Any training provided for an occupational licensee may be conducted either in a licensed casino facility or at a school with which a casino licensee has entered into an agreement. §   -15 Temporary supplier and occupational licenses.  (a) Upon written request of a person applying for a supplier or occupational license under this chapter, the executive director shall issue a temporary license to the applicant and permit the applicant to undertake employment with, conduct business transactions with, and provide goods and services to, casino licensees, casino license applicants, and holders of certificates of suitability; provided that all of the following provisions are met: (1)  The applicant has submitted to the commission a completed application, an application fee, and all required disclosure forms and other required written documentation and materials; (2)  Preliminary review of the application and a criminal history check by the executive director and the commission staff does not reveal that the applicant or the applicant's affiliates, key persons, local and regional managerial employees or sales and service representatives, or substantial owners have been convicted of a felony or misdemeanor that would require denial of the application or may otherwise be ineligible, unqualified, or unsuitable to permit licensure under this chapter; (3)  There is no other apparent deficiency in the application that may require denial of the application; and (4)  The applicant has an offer of employment from, or agreement to begin providing goods and services to, a casino licensee, casino license applicant, or holder of a certificate of suitability upon receipt of the temporary license or the applicant shows good cause for being granted a temporary license. (b)  A temporary license issued under this section shall be valid for no more than one hundred and eighty days but may be renewed upon expiration by the executive director. (c)  An applicant who receives a temporary license under this section may undertake employment with or supply a casino licensee, casino license applicants, and holders of certificates of suitability with goods and services subject to this chapter until a license is issued by the commission pursuant to the applicant's application or until the temporary license expires or is suspended or revoked. During the period of the temporary license, the applicant shall comply with this chapter and rules adopted by the commission. (d)  If the temporary license expires, is not renewed, or is suspended or revoked, the executive director shall immediately forward the applicant's application to the commission for action after first providing a reasonable time for the applicant to correct any apparent deficiency in its application. §   -16  Annual report.  The commission shall submit an annual report to the governor and the legislature no later than sixty days before the close of each fiscal year and shall submit any additional reports that the governor or the legislature requests.  The annual report shall include: (1)  A statement of receipts and disbursements related to casino gaming pursuant to this chapter; (2)  Actions taken by the commission; and (3)  Any additional information and recommendations that the commission may deem valuable or which the governor or the legislature may request. §   -17  Hearings by the commission.  (a)  Upon order of the commission, one of the commission members or a hearings officer designated by the commission may conduct any hearing provided for under this chapter related to casino gaming or by commission rule and may recommend findings and decisions to the commission.  The record made at the time of the hearing shall be reviewed by the commission, or a majority thereof, and the findings and decisions of the majority of the commission shall constitute the order of the commission in that case. (b)  Any party aggrieved by an action of the commission denying, suspending, revoking, restricting, or refusing to renew a license under this chapter may request in writing a hearing before the commission within five days after service of notice of the action of the commission.  Notice of the actions of the commission shall be served either by personal delivery or by certified mail, postage prepaid, to the aggrieved party. Notice served by certified mail shall be deemed complete on the business day following the date of the mailing.  The commission shall conduct all requested hearings promptly and in reasonable order. §   -18  Conduct of casino gaming.  Casino gaming may be conducted by the holder of a casino license, subject to the following: (1)  The site of the casino facility shall be restricted to the city and county of Honolulu; (2)  The term of the casino license shall be twenty years and shall be renewable for additional twenty-year terms; provided that: (A)  The casino facility has demonstrated an effort to increase tourism, generate jobs, provide revenue to the local economy, and provide revenue to the general fund; (B)  The casino licensee's actions have not caused the casino license under this chapter to be suspended or revoked; and (C)  The applicant and its qualifiers remain eligible and suitable for a casino license; (3)  The casino facility may operate twenty-four hours per day, every day of the year; (4)  Minimum and maximum wagers on games shall be set by the casino licensee; (5)  The commission's agents may enter and inspect the casino facility at any time for the purpose of determining whether the casino licensee is in compliance with this chapter; (6)  Commission employees shall have the right to be present in a casino facility or on adjacent facilities under the control of the casino licensee; (7)  Gaming equipment and supplies customarily used in conducting casino gaming shall be purchased or leased only from suppliers licensed under this chapter; (8)  Persons licensed under this chapter shall permit no form of wagering on games except as permitted by this chapter; (9)  Wagers may be received only from a person present in a licensed casino facility; provided that no person present in a licensed casino facility shall place or attempt to place a wager on behalf of another person who is not present in the casino facility; (10)  Wagering shall not be conducted with money or other negotiable currency, except for wagering on slot machines; (11)  No person under age twenty-one shall be permitted in an area of a casino facility where casino gaming is being conducted, except for a person at least eighteen years of age who is an employee of the casino facility.  No employee under age twenty-one shall perform any function involved in casino gaming by patrons.  No person under age twenty-one shall be permitted to make a wager under this chapter; (12)  All tokens, chips, or electronic cards used to make wagers shall only be purchased from the casino licensee within the casino facility.  The tokens, chips, or electronic cards may be purchased by means of an agreement under which the casino licensee extends credit to the wagerer. The tokens, chips, or electronic cards shall be used while within a casino facility only for the purpose of making wagers on authorized games; (13)  Prior to commencing gaming operations at the casino facility, the casino licensee shall enter into a development agreement with the State that includes at least the following terms: (A)  The casino licensee agrees to invest at least $500,000,000 to develop and construct a casino facility, including land, and soft and hard costs; (B)  The casino licensee agrees to use best efforts to train residents of the State for jobs that are available at the casino facility; (C)  The casino licensee agrees that neither the casino licensee, nor any parent or subsidiary of the casino licensee, will permit wagering within the State on Hawaii collegiate athletics; (D)  The casino licensee shall use best efforts to increase tourism, generate jobs, provide revenue to the local economy and the State; and (E)  The casino licensee and the State agree that, other than the one casino facility licensed under this chapter, the State shall not authorize any additional gaming in the State without the prior written consent of the casino licensee and the State; and (14)  All casino gaming shall be conducted in accordance with all rules adopted by the commission. §   -19  Collection of amounts owing under credit agreements. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a casino licensee who extends credit to a wagerer shall be expressly authorized to institute a cause of action to collect any amounts due and owing under the extension of credit, as well as the licensee's costs, expenses, and reasonable attorney's fees incurred in collection. §   -20  Wagering tax; rate; disposition.  (a)  A wagering tax shall be imposed on the monthly gross receipts received from casino gaming authorized under this chapter.  The tax imposed on table games shall be at the rate of fifteen per cent and the tax for all gambling games other than table games, including but not limited to slot machines, video game of chance gambling, and electronic gambling games shall be at the rate of twenty percent.  The wagering tax imposed by this section shall be in lieu of all other state taxes on gross or adjusted gross receipts, including taxes levied under chapters 237 and 239, except income taxes.  All other income received by the casino licensee that is not from casino gaming shall not be subject to the wagering tax but shall be subject to any other state taxes on gross or adjusted gross receipts levied under chapters 237 and 239. (b)  Tax revenue collected under this section shall be divided as follows: (1)  Eighty-five per cent shall be deposited into the state general fund; provided that from these revenues, the following amounts shall be retained by the commission and deposited into the state gaming fund established under section    ‑21 for use by the commission as follows: (A)  One per cent of the tax revenues to fund a compulsive gamblers program and for public security at the casino facility; and (B)  Not more than one per cent of the tax revenues to fund administrative expenses of the commission; (2)  Ten per cent transferred to the city and county of Honolulu; and (3)  Five per cent deposited into a fund to support the new aloha stadium entertainment district. §   -21  State gaming fund; disposition of taxes collected.  There is established within the state treasury the state gaming fund to be administered by the Hawaii gaming control commission into which shall be deposited all fees, taxes, and fines collected under this chapter other than the wagering tax collected pursuant to section ‑20.  Moneys from the state gaming fund shall be allocated as follows: (1)  Twenty-five per cent to the department of education; (2)  Forty per cent to the compulsive gamblers program established under section    -23 and for public security at the casino facility; and (3)  Thirty-five per cent to fund administrative expenses of the commission. §   -22  Program and financial audit.  After the first full fiscal year of operation, the auditor shall conduct a program and financial audit of the commission.  Thereafter, the auditor shall conduct a program and financial audit every four years after the initial audit is completed. §   -23  Compulsive gamblers program.  The commission shall create and implement a program to assist individuals who are identified as compulsive gamblers. §   -24 Disclosure of information.  The commission, upon written request from any person, shall provide the following information concerning the applicant or licensee, the applicant's or licensee's products, services, or gambling enterprises, and the applicant's or licensee's business holdings if the commission has the information in its possession: (1)  The name, business address, and business telephone number; (2)  An identification of any applicant or licensee including, if an applicant or licensee is not an individual, its state of incorporation or registration, its corporate officers, and the identity of its qualifiers; (3)  The name and business telephone number of any attorney, counsel, lobbyist, or any other person representing an applicant or a licensee in matters before the commission; and (4)  A description of the product or service to be supplied by, or occupation to be engaged in by, a licensee. §   -25  License issuance fee.  In addition to any other fee or payment required under this chapter, there shall be a one-time fee of $150,000,000, in cash or cash equivalent, to be paid as follows: (1)  $75,000,000 as a condition precedent to the issuance of the casino license; and (2)  $75,000,000 one year after the casino license is issued. Upon payment of the $75,000,000 payment due one year after the casino license is issued, the casino licensee shall be credited with this payment against the wagering tax imposed upon the casino licensee under section    ‑20 .  The credit shall be applied to the percentage of tax that is deposited in the general fund to be amortized over a period of ten years after that payment is made.  The fee shall be deposited into the general fund.  Once issued, the license shall be non-transferable and shall be valid only for the person or entity in whose name it was issued and for the operation of the casino facility at the designated place." SECTION 2.  Chapter 712, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part III to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§712-     Casino gaming; exemption.  This part shall not apply to casino gaming as authorized by chapter ." SECTION 3.  Section 46-80.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows: "(e)  Exemptions. (1)  Property owned by the state or county governments or entities, may be exempt from the assessment except as provided in paragraph (3); (2)  Property owned by the federal government or entities, shall be exempt from the assessment except as provided in paragraph (3); (3)  If a public body owning property, including property held in trust for any beneficiary, which is exempt from an assessment pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), grants a leasehold or other possessory interest in the property to a nonexempt person or entity, the assessment, notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), shall be levied on the leasehold or possessory interest and shall be payable by the lessee; (4)  The construction of any casino facility authorized under chapter     shall be exempt from the assessment and any special improvement district requirements regarding redevelopment authorized by subsection (a); [(4)] (5)  The redevelopment of the Ala Wai boat harbor shall be exempt from the assessment and any special improvement district requirements authorized by subsection (a); and [(5)] (6) No other properties or owners shall be exempt from the assessment unless the properties or owners are expressly exempted in the ordinance establishing a district adopted pursuant to this section or amending the rate or method of assessment of an existing district." SECTION 4.  Section 76-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  The civil service to which this chapter applies shall comprise all positions in the State now existing or hereafter established and embrace all personal services performed for the State, except the following: (1)  Commissioned and enlisted personnel of the Hawaii National Guard and positions in the Hawaii National Guard that are required by state or federal laws or regulations or orders of the National Guard to be filled from those commissioned or enlisted personnel; (2)  Positions filled by persons employed by contract where the director of human resources development has certified that the service is special or unique or is essential to the public interest and that, because of circumstances surrounding its fulfillment, personnel to perform the service cannot be obtained through normal civil service recruitment procedures.  Any contract may be for any period not exceeding one year; (3)  Positions that must be filled without delay to comply with a court order or decree if the director determines that recruitment through normal recruitment civil service procedures would result in delay or noncompliance, such as the Felix-Cayetano consent decree; (4)  Positions filled by the legislature or by either house or any committee thereof; (5)  Employees in the office of the governor and office of the lieutenant governor, and household employees at Washington Place; (6)  Positions filled by popular vote; (7)  Department heads, officers, and members of any board, commission, or other state agency whose appointments are made by the governor or are required by law to be confirmed by the senate; (8)  Judges, referees, receivers, masters, jurors, notaries public, land court examiners, court commissioners, and attorneys appointed by a state court for a special temporary service; (9)  One bailiff for the chief justice of the supreme court who shall have the powers and duties of a court officer and bailiff under section 606-14; one secretary or clerk for each justice of the supreme court, each judge of the intermediate appellate court, and each judge of the circuit court; one secretary for the judicial council; one deputy administrative director of the courts; three law clerks for the chief justice of the supreme court, two law clerks for each associate justice of the supreme court and each judge of the intermediate appellate court, one law clerk for each judge of the circuit court, two additional law clerks for the civil administrative judge of the circuit court of the first circuit, two additional law clerks for the criminal administrative judge of the circuit court of the first circuit, one additional law clerk for the senior judge of the family court of the first circuit, two additional law clerks for the civil motions judge of the circuit court of the first circuit, two additional law clerks for the criminal motions judge of the circuit court of the first circuit, and two law clerks for the administrative judge of the district court of the first circuit; and one private secretary for the administrative director of the courts, the deputy administrative director of the courts, each department head, each deputy or first assistant, and each additional deputy, or assistant deputy, or assistant defined in paragraph (16); (10)  First deputy and deputy attorneys general, the administrative services manager of the department of the attorney general, one secretary for the administrative services manager, an administrator and any support staff for the criminal and juvenile justice resources coordination functions, and law clerks; (11)  (A)  Teachers, principals, vice-principals, complex area superintendents, deputy and assistant superintendents, other certificated personnel, and no more than twenty noncertificated administrative, professional, and technical personnel not engaged in instructional work; (B)  Effective July 1, 2003, teaching assistants, educational assistants, bilingual or bicultural school-home assistants, school psychologists, psychological examiners, speech pathologists, athletic health care trainers, alternative school work study assistants, alternative school educational or supportive services specialists, alternative school project coordinators, and communications aides in the department of education; (C)  The special assistant to the state librarian and one secretary for the special assistant to the state librarian; and (D)  Members of the faculty of the university of Hawaii, including research workers, extension agents, personnel engaged in instructional work, and administrative, professional, and technical personnel of the university; (12)  Employees engaged in special, research, or demonstration projects approved by the governor; (13)  (A)  Positions filled by inmates, patients of state institutions, and persons with severe physical or mental disabilities participating in the work experience training programs; (B)  Positions filled with students in accordance with guidelines for established state employment programs; and (C)  Positions that provide work experience training or temporary public service employment that are filled by persons entering the workforce or persons transitioning into other careers under programs such as the federal Workforce Investment Act of 1998, as amended, or the Senior Community Service Employment Program of the Employment and Training Administration of the United States Department of Labor, or under other similar state programs; (14)  A custodian or guide at Iolani Palace, the Royal Mausoleum, and Hulihee Palace; (15)  Positions filled by persons employed on a fee, contract, or piecework basis, who may lawfully perform their duties concurrently with their private business or profession or other private employment and whose duties require only a portion of their time, if it is impracticable to ascertain or anticipate the portion of time to be devoted to the service of the State; (16)  Positions of first deputies or first assistants of each department head appointed under or in the manner provided in section 6, article V, of the Hawaii State Constitution; three additional deputies or assistants either in charge of the highways, harbors, and airports divisions or other functions within the department of transportation as may be assigned by the director of transportation, with the approval of the governor; one additional deputy in the department of human services either in charge of welfare or other functions within the department as may be assigned by the director of human services; four additional deputies in the department of health, each in charge of one of the following: behavioral health, environmental health, hospitals, and health resources administration, including other functions within the department as may be assigned by the director of health, with the approval of the governor; two additional deputies in charge of the law enforcement programs, administration, or other functions within the department of law enforcement as may be assigned by the director of law enforcement, with the approval of the governor; three additional deputies each in charge of the correctional institutions, rehabilitation services and programs, and administration or other functions within the department of corrections and rehabilitation as may be assigned by the director of corrections and rehabilitation, with the approval of the governor; two administrative assistants to the state librarian; and an administrative assistant to the superintendent of education; (17)  Positions specifically exempted from this part by any other law; provided that: (A)  Any exemption created after July 1, 2014, shall expire three years after its enactment unless affirmatively extended by an act of the legislature; and (B)  All of the positions defined by paragraph (9) shall be included in the position classification plan; (18)  Positions in the state foster grandparent program and positions for temporary employment of senior citizens in occupations in which there is a severe personnel shortage or in special projects; (19)  Household employees at the official residence of the president of the university of Hawaii; (20)  Employees in the department of education engaged in the supervision of students during meal periods in the distribution, collection, and counting of meal tickets, and in the cleaning of classrooms after school hours on a less than half-time basis; (21)  Employees hired under the tenant hire program of the Hawaii public housing authority; provided that no more than twenty-six per cent of the authority's workforce in any housing project maintained or operated by the authority shall be hired under the tenant hire program; (22)  Positions of the federally funded expanded food and nutrition program of the university of Hawaii that require the hiring of nutrition program assistants who live in the areas they serve; (23)  Positions filled by persons with severe disabilities who are certified by the state vocational rehabilitation office that they are able to perform safely the duties of the positions; (24)  The sheriff; (25)  A gender and other fairness coordinator hired by the judiciary; (26)  Positions in the Hawaii National Guard youth and adult education programs; (27)  In the Hawaii state energy office in the department of business, economic development, and tourism, all energy program managers, energy program specialists, energy program assistants, and energy analysts; (28)  Administrative appeals hearing officers in the department of human services; (29)  In the Med-QUEST division of the department of human services, the division administrator, finance officer, health care services branch administrator, medical director, and clinical standards administrator; (30)  In the director's office of the department of human services, the enterprise officer, information security and privacy compliance officer, security and privacy compliance engineer, security and privacy compliance analyst, information technology implementation manager, assistant information technology implementation manager, resource manager, community or project development director, policy director, special assistant to the director, and limited English proficiency project manager or coordinator; (31)  The Alzheimer's disease and related dementia services coordinator in the executive office on aging; (32)  In the Hawaii emergency management agency, the executive officer, public information officer, civil defense administrative officer, branch chiefs, and emergency operations center state warning point personnel; provided that for state warning point personnel, the director shall determine that recruitment through normal civil service recruitment procedures would result in delay or noncompliance; (33)  The executive director and seven full-time administrative positions of the school facilities authority; (34)  Positions in the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight authority; (35)  In the office of homeland security of the department of law enforcement, the statewide interoperable communications coordinator; (36)  In the social services division of the department of human services, the business technology analyst; (37)  The executive director and staff of the 911 board; (38)  The software developer supervisor and senior software developers in the department of taxation; (39)  In the department of law enforcement, five Commission on Accreditation for Law Enforcement Agencies, Inc., coordinator positions; (40)  The state fire marshal and deputy state fire marshal in the office of the state fire marshal; (41)  The administrator for the law enforcement standards board; (42)  In the office of the director of taxation, the data privacy officer and tax business analysts; [and] [[](43)[]]    All positions filled by the Hawaii tourism authority within the department of business, economic development, and tourism[.]; and (44)  The executive director and any assistants, officers, or employees of the Hawaii gaming control commission. The director shall determine the applicability of this section to specific positions. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the civil service status of any incumbent as it existed on July 1, 1955." SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of funding the operations of the Hawaii gaming control commission; provided that the: (1)  Casino licensee shall reimburse the amount appropriated by remitting $5,000,000 to the director of finance no later than the first day on which the casino opens for operation; (2)  Casino licensee's application fee under section    ‑8(e), Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be applied as a credit against the $5,000,000 amount due under this section; and (3)  Amount the casino licensee reimburses the State under this section shall also be credited against the wagering tax imposed under section    ‑20, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of commerce and consumer affairs for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________